Wyoming, session 2025, HB0134.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-1401 is created to read:

ARTICLE 14
STATE AND FEDERAL FUNDS AND SEXUALLY EXPLICIT EVENTS

HB0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0373
9-4-1401. State and federal funds; sexually explicit
events prohibited; definitions; hearings; appeals.

(a) As used in this section, "sexually explicit
event" means any show, exhibition or presentation before an
audience that lewdly or lasciviously depicts or simulates
nudity, sexual conduct, sexual excitement, prosthetic or
imitation genitals or breasts, subject to determination by
the entities specified in subsection (c) of this section.
"Sexually explicit event" shall not include age appropriate
sexual education instruction at the primary, secondary,
undergraduate or graduate level.

(b) No executive, legislative or judicial branch
agency, department or institution, nor any city, town,
county or political subdivision, including the University
of Wyoming, the community colleges and school districts,
shall use state or federal funds, personnel, facilities or
equipment to sponsor or contribute to a sexually explicit
event.

HB0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0373
(c) Upon request by the sponsor of an event, the
following entities shall determine whether an event is
sexually explicit:

(i) For all executive branch agencies, the
governor;

(ii) For the University of Wyoming, the board of
trustees for the university;

(iii) For community colleges, the community
college commission;

(iv) For primary and secondary public schools,
the applicable local school board;

(v) For cities and towns, the applicable
governing body;

(vi) For counties, the applicable board of
county commissioners;

HB0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0373
(vii) For the judicial branch, the chief
justice;

(viii) For the legislative branch, the president
of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives.

(d) In determining whether an event is sexually
explicit under subsection (c) of this section, the
following shall apply:

(i) A determination shall be made within thirty
(30) calendar days of receiving a request;

(ii) The requestor shall have fifteen (15)
calendar days after a decision regarding whether the event
is sexually explicit to appeal that decision; and

(iii) An appeal under this subsection shall be
considered a contested case hearing that shall be conducted
in the same manner as a contested case hearing under the
Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

HB0134

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0373
(e) If it is determined that state or federal funds
were used for a sexually explicit event, the recipient
shall repay the funds expended to the granting entity
within twenty (20) business days of the determination.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0134